Hawaii statutes.
§481H-8 Remedies. (a) Any violation
of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute unfair methods of
competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any
trade or commerce under section 480-2.

(b) The penalty provided in subsection (a) is
in addition to remedies otherwise available against the same conduct under the
common law or other statutes of this State. [L 1991, c 260, pt of §1; am L
2008, c 19, §22]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next